Hawaii statutes.
§510-22 Rebuttable presumptions. In
determining whether this part applies to specific property the following
rebuttable presumptions apply:

(1) Property acquired during marriage by a spouse of
that marriage while domiciled in a jurisdiction under whose laws property could
then be acquired as community property is presumed to have been acquired as or
to have become, and remained, property to which this part applies; and

(2) Real property situated in this State and personal
property wherever situated acquired by a married person while domiciled in a
jurisdiction under whose laws property could not then be acquired as community
property, title to which was taken in a form which created rights of
survivorship, is presumed not to be property to which this part applies. [L
1973, c 132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next